Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.070

School district as self-insurer—Authority.

Any school district board of directors is authorized to enter into agreements with the board of directors of other school districts and/or educational service districts to form a self-insurance group for the purpose of qualifying as a self-insurer under chapter 51.14 RCW.

[ 1982 c 191 s 10. Formerly RCW 28A.58.410.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 191: See note following RCW 28A.335.210.

School districts as self-insurers: RCW 51.14.150 and 51.14.160.